Tennessee statutes. Title 44 Animals And Animal Husbandry
Part 4

Running at Large

44-8-401. Livestock not to run at large — Punishment.

It is unlawful for the owners of any livestock, as defined in § 43-1-114, to willfully allow the livestock to run at large in this state.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1947, ch. 52, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 5087.1 (Williams, § 5077.1); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1401, 44-8-101; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 2014, ch. 568, § 4.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment substituted “as defined in §43-1-114” for “as livestock is commonly known and defined” in (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 568, § 6. March 21, 2014.

Cross-References. Cattle guards, title 65, ch. 6, part 3.

Humane treatment of animals not subject to state game and fish laws, §5-9-110.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Animals, § 33; 13 Tenn. Juris., Fences, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Negligence — Animals on Highway — Motor Vehicle Accident, 28 Tenn. L. Rev. 290.

Cited: Lowery v. Faires, 57 F. Supp. 2d 483, 1998 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 22594 (E.D. Tenn. 1998); McElroy v. Carter, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 635 (Tenn. Ct. App. Sept. 29, 2006).

44-8-402. Lien for damages.

For any damages occasioned by stock running at large in violation of §44-8-401, the person so damaged shall have a lien upon the stock, which lien shall be enforced by attachment before a judge of the court of general sessions in the same manner and to the same extent as other liens are enforced.

Acts 1947, ch. 52, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 5087.2 (Williams, § 5077.2); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-1402; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 2; T.C.A., §44-8-102.

Collateral References.

Lien on animal damage feasant, character and extent of claims for which attaches. 26 A.L.R. 1047.

44-8-403. [Repealed.]

Code 1858, § 1663 (deriv. Acts 1803, ch. 20, §§ 1, 4); Shan., § 2849; mod. Code 1932, § 5078; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1403, 44-8-103; repealed by Acts 2015, ch. 73, § 1, effective April 6, 2015.

Compiler's Notes. Former §44-8-403 concerned penalty for stallion or jackass running at large.

44-8-404. [Repealed.]

Code 1858, § 1664; Shan., § 2850; Code 1932, § 5079; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-1404; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 2; T.C.A., §44-8-104; repealed by Acts 2015, ch. 73, § 1, effective April 6, 2015.

Compiler's Notes. Former §44-8-404 concerned animal to be advertised.

44-8-405. [Repealed.]

Code 1858, § 1665 (deriv. Acts 1803, ch. 20, § 2); Shan., § 2851; mod. Code 1932, § 5080; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-1405; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 2; T.C.A., §44-8-105; repealed by Acts 2015, ch. 73, § 1, effective April 6, 2015.

Compiler's Notes. Former §44-8-405 concerned gelding unclaimed animal; costs.

44-8-406. [Repealed.]

Code 1858, § 1666 (deriv. Acts 1803, ch. 20, § 3); Shan., § 2852; Code 1932, § 5081; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1406, 44-8-106; repealed by Acts 2015, ch. 73, § 1, effective April 6, 2015.

Compiler's Notes. Former §44-8-406 concerned animals being treated as strays when owner unknown or residing out of county.

44-8-407. [Repealed.]

Code 1858, § 1667; Shan., § 2853; Code 1932, § 5082; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-1407; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 2; T.C.A., §44-8-107; repealed by Acts 2015, ch. 73, § 1, effective April 6, 2015.

Compiler's Notes. Former §44-8-407 concerned compensation to taker-up.

44-8-408. Dogs not allowed at large — Exception — Penalties.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, “owner” means a person who, at the time of the offense, regularly harbors, keeps or exercises control over the dog, but does not include a person who, at the time of the offense, is temporarily harboring, keeping or exercising control over the dog.

The owner of a dog commits an offense if that dog goes uncontrolled by the owner upon the premises of another without the consent of the owner of the premises or other person authorized to give consent, or goes uncontrolled by the owner upon a highway, public road, street or any other place open to the public generally.

It is an exception to the application of this section that:

The dog was on a hunt or chase;

The dog was on the way to or from a hunt or chase;

The dog was guarding or driving stock or on the way to guard or drive stock;

The dog was being moved from one place to another by the owner of the dog;

The dog is a police or military dog, the injury occurred during the course of the dog's official duties and the person injured was a party to, a participant in or suspected of being a party to or participant in the act or conduct that prompted the police or military to utilize the services of the dog;

The violation of subsection (b) occurred while the injured person was on the private property of the dog's owner with the intent to engage in unlawful activity while on the property;

The violation of subsection (b) occurred while the dog was protecting the dog's owner or other innocent party from attack by the injured person or an animal owned by the injured person;

The violation of subsection (b) occurred while the dog was securely confined in a kennel, crate or other enclosure; or

The violation of subsection (b) occurred as a result of the injured person disturbing, harassing, assaulting or otherwise provoking the dog.

The exception to the application of this section provided in subdivisions (c)(1)-(4) shall not apply unless the owner in violation of subsection (b) pays or tenders payment for all damages caused by the dog to the injured party within thirty (30) days of the damage being caused.

It is not a defense to prosecution for a violation of subsection (b) and punished pursuant to subdivision (g)(1), (g)(2) or (g)(3) that the dog owner exercised reasonable care in attempting to confine or control the dog.

It is an affirmative defense to prosecution for a violation of subsection (b) and punished pursuant to subdivision (g)(4) or (g)(5) that the dog owner exercised reasonable care in attempting to confine or control the dog.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor punishable by fine only.

A violation of this section is a Class B misdemeanor punishable by fine only if the dog running at large causes damage to the property of another.

A violation of this section is a Class A misdemeanor punishable by fine only if the dog running at large causes bodily injury, as defined by § 39-11-106, to another.

A violation of this section is a Class E felony if the dog running at large causes serious bodily injury, as defined by § 39-11-106, to another.

A violation of this section is a Class D felony if the dog running at large causes the death of another.

Notwithstanding subsection (g), a violation of this section shall be punished as provided in subsection (i) if the violation involves:

A dog that was trained to fight, attack or kill or had been used to fight; or

The owner of the dog violating this section knew of the dangerous nature of the dog and, prior to the violation of this section, the dog had bitten one (1) or more people that resulted in serious bodily injury or death.

A violation of this section, where one (1) or more of the factors set out in subsection (h) are present, shall be punished as follows:

A Class C misdemeanor if the dog running at large does not cause property damage, injury or death;

A Class A misdemeanor if the dog running at large causes damage to the property of another;

A Class E felony if the dog running at large causes bodily injury to another;

A Class D felony if the dog running at large causes serious bodily injury to another; and

A Class C felony if the dog running at large causes the death of another.

In addition to the authority granted by §§ 5-1-120, 6-2-201(30), 6-19-101(a)(31), 6-33-101, and 7-1-102, a local government may authorize by resolution or ordinance, as applicable, an animal control agency to seize and take into custody any dog found trespassing on the premises of another.

For purposes of this subsection (j):

“Animal control agency” means a county or municipal animal shelter, dog pound, or animal control agency; private humane society; state, county, or municipal law enforcement agency; or any combination thereof, that temporarily houses stray, unwanted, or injured animals; and

“Local government” means any county, municipality, city, or town.

Acts 1901, ch. 50, § 1; 1903, ch. 419, § 1; Shan., § 2853a4; Code 1932, § 5086; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1408, 44-8-108; Acts 2007, ch. 533, § 1; 2007, ch. 556, § 1; 2016, ch. 1013, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 533, § 1 directed that §44-8-409 be amended, effective July 1, 2007; Acts 2007, ch. 556, § 2 directed that §44-8-409 be deleted in its entirety, effective July 1, 2007. Under the direction of the code commission, the amended provisions of § 44-8-409 were added to this section as subsections (h) and (i).

Amendments. The 2007 amendment by ch. 533 added (h) and (i). See the Compiler's Notes.

The 2007 amendment by ch. 556 rewrote the section which read: “It is unlawful for any person to allow a dog belonging to or under the control of such person, or that may be habitually found on premises occupied by the person, or immediately under the control of such person, to go upon the premises of another, or upon a highway or upon a public road or street; provided, that this section and §44-8-409 shall not apply to a dog on a hunt or chase, or on the way to or from a hunt or chase, nor to a dog guarding or driving stock, or on the way for that purpose, nor to a dog being moved from one (1) place to another, by a person owning or controlling a dog; provided, that the foregoing exemptions shall not apply unless all damages done by dogs therein exempted, to the person or property of another, shall be paid or tendered to the person so damaged, or to the person's agent, within thirty (30) days after the damage is done.”

The 2016 amendment added (j).

Effective Dates. Acts 2007, ch. 533, § 2. July 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, ch. 556, § 3. July 1, 2007.

Acts 2016, ch. 1013, § 2. April 28, 2016.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A, B and C misdemeanors, §40-35-111.

Penalty for Class C, D and E felonies, §40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 1-8-3.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Animals, §§ 30, 31; 13 Tenn. Juris., Game and Game Laws, § 3.

Law Reviews.

The Standard of Care for Veterinarians in Medical Malpractice Claims (Joseph H. King, Jr.), 58 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1990).

Cited: Birdsong v. Wilkinson, 13 Tenn. App. 276, 1931 Tenn. App. LEXIS 70 (1931); Alex v. Armstrong, 215 Tenn. 276, 385 S.W.2d 110, 1964 Tenn. LEXIS 564 (Tenn. Dec. 11, 1964); McAbee v. Daniel, 60 Tenn. App. 239, 445 S.W.2d 917, 1968 Tenn. App. LEXIS 285 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1968); McElroy v. Carter, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 635 (Tenn. Ct. App. Sept. 29, 2006).

44-8-409. [Transferred.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §44-8-409 (Acts 1901, ch. 50, § 3; Shan., § 2853a5; Code 1932, § 5087; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1409,44-8-109; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113), concerning violation of §44-8-408, was amended by Acts Acts 2007, ch. 533 and Acts 2007, ch. 556, § 2, effective July 1, 2007, and transferred to §44-8-408. For the current provisions see §44-8-408(h) and (i).

44-8-410. Bitches to be confined while proud.

Every owner of a bitch is required to confine the same for twenty-four (24) days during the time the bitch is proud.

Acts 1901, ch. 122, § 1; Shan., § 2853a1; Code 1932, § 5083; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1410, 44-8-110.

44-8-411. No liability for killing proud bitch at large.

Any person crippling, killing, or in any way destroying a proud bitch that is running at large shall not be held liable for the damages due to such killing or destruction.

Acts 1901, ch. 22, § 2; Shan., § 2853a2; mod. Code 1932, § 5084; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1411, 44-8-111.

Cross-References. No damages for killing dog killing or worrying livestock, §44-17-203.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Animals, § 5.

44-8-412. Violation of § 44-8-410 a misdemeanor.

A violation of §44-8-410 is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1901, ch. 22, § 3; Shan., § 2853a3; Code 1932, § 5085; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1412, 44-8-112; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

44-8-413. Civil liability for injury caused by dogs.

The owner of a dog has a duty to keep that dog under reasonable control at all times, and to keep that dog from running at large. A person who breaches that duty is subject to civil liability for any damages suffered by a person who is injured by the dog while in a public place or lawfully in or on the private property of another.

The owner may be held liable regardless of whether the dog has shown any dangerous propensities or whether the dog's owner knew or should have known of the dog's dangerous propensities.

Subsection (a) shall not be construed to impose liability upon the owner of the dog if:

The dog is a police or military dog, the injury occurred during the course of the dog's official duties and the person injured was a party to, a participant in or suspected of being a party to or participant in the act or conduct that prompted the police or military to utilize the services of the dog;

The injured person was trespassing upon the private, nonresidential property of the dog's owner;

The injury occurred while the dog was protecting the dog's owner or other innocent party from attack by the injured person or a dog owned by the injured person;

The injury occurred while the dog was securely confined in a kennel, crate or other enclosure; or

The injury occurred as a result of the injured person enticing, disturbing, alarming, harassing, or otherwise provoking the dog.

If a dog causes damage to a person while the person is on residential, farm or other noncommercial property, and the dog's owner is the owner of the property, or is on the property by permission of the owner or as a lawful tenant or lessee, in any civil action based upon such damages brought against the owner of the dog, the claimant shall be required to establish that the dog's owner knew or should have known of the dog's dangerous propensities.

The element of proof required by subdivision (c)(1) shall be in addition to any other elements the claimant may be required to prove in order to establish a claim under the prevailing Tennessee law of premises liability or comparative fault.

The statute of limitations for an action brought pursuant to this section shall be the same as provided in § 28-3-104, for personal injury actions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Owner” means a person who, at the time of the damage caused to another, regularly harbors, keeps, or exercises control over the dog, but does not include a person who, at the time of the damage, is temporarily harboring, keeping, or exercising control over the dog; provided, however, that land ownership alone is not enough to qualify a landowner as a regular harborer even if the landowner gave permission to a third person to keep the dog on the land; and

“Running at large” means a dog goes uncontrolled by the dog's owner upon the premises of another without the consent of the owner of the premises, or other person authorized to give consent, or goes uncontrolled by the owner upon a highway, public road, street or any other place open to the public generally.

Acts 2007, ch. 276, § 1; 2016, ch. 662, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 276, § 2 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Diana Acklen Act of 2007.”

Acts 2016, ch. 662, § 2, provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to all cases tried on or after July 1, 2016.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment, in (e)(1), inserted a comma following “keeps” and “keeping”, and added the proviso at the end.

Effective Dates. Acts 2007, ch. 276, § 3. July 1, 2007.

Acts 2016, ch. 662, § 2. July 1, 2016.